Utah statutes.
63G-14-206.   Restrictions on activities of resident immigrant.

(1) (a)  A resident immigrant may not travel outside of the state without the express written approval of the department.

(b)  The department shall by rule, made in accordance with Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, provide a process by which a person obtains approval to travel as required by Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  The department may by rule, made in accordance with Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, impose other requirements to maintain the status of a resident immigrant that are consistent with this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 20, 2011 General Session

